Ohio, session 136, HB652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3937.26 be amended and section 3937.261 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3937.26. (A)(A)(1) An insurer may refuse to renew a policy of commercial property insurance, commercial fire insurance, or commercial casualty insurance other than fidelity or surety bonds, medical malpractice insurance, and automobile insurance as defined in section 3937.30 of the Revised Code, by mailing sending a written notice of the insurer's intention not to renew the policy to the insured, at the insured's last known address, and the insured's agent or agent of record, as applicable, at least thirty sixty days prior to the date of the expiration date of the policy, a notice of the insurer's intention not to renew the policy. (2) If the insured has agreed to receive communications from the insurer via electronic means, the written notice may be sent via electronic means; (3) If the insured has not agreed to receive communications from the insurer via electronic means, the written notice shall be sent via mail to the insured's and the agent's last known address. (4) Such notice shall contain all of the following: (1)(a) The policy number; (2)(b) The date of the notice; (3)(c) The expiration date of the policy. Such notice of nonrenewal also shall be mailed to the insured's agent. (B) If the notice of nonrenewal is mailed sent less than thirty sixty days before the expiration date of the policy, the insured's coverage then in effect remains in effect until thirty sixty days after the date of mailing the notice was sent, unless the agent, agent of record, or the insured notifies the insurer in writing that the insured accepts the nonrenewal as stated. The insurer shall notify the insured of the amount of the premium for the time after the expiration date that the coverage may remain in effect, and the insured shall pay such premium unless the insured accepts the stated nonrenewal. The premium must be calculated using the rates originally applicable to the insured's coverage then in effect. Sec. 3937.261. (A)(1) An insurer may refuse to renew a personal lines policy of homeowners insurance, including coverage for tenants or condominium owners or owner-occupied fire or dwelling property coverage, by sending a written notice of the insurer's intention not to renew the policy to the insured and the insured's agent or agent of record, as applicable. (2) If the insured has agreed to receive communications from the insurer via electronic means, the written notice may be sent via electronic means; (3) If the insured has not agreed to receive communications from the insurer via electronic means, the written notice shall be sent via mail to the insured's and the agent's last known address. (B)(1) The notice of nonrenewal required under division (A) of this section shall be sent at least sixty days prior to the expiration date of the policy. (2)(a) If the notice of nonrenewal is sent less than sixty days before the expiration date of the policy, the insured's coverage then in effect remains in effect until sixty days after the date the notice was sent, unless the insured notifies the insurer in writing that the insurer accepts the nonrenewal as stated. (b) The insurer shall notify the insured of the amount of the premium for the time after the expiration date that the coverage may remain in effect, and the insured shall pay such premium unless the insured accepts the stated nonrenewal. The premium shall be calculated using the rates originally applicable to the insured's coverage then in effect. (C) The notice of nonrenewal required under division (A) of this section shall include all of the following: (1) The policy number; (2) The date of the notice; (3) The effective date of expiration; (4) Either of the following: (a) An explanation of the reason for nonrenewal and the information upon which it is based; (b) A statement that such an explanation will be provided to the insured in writing within five days after the insurer receives a written request for such an explanation from the insured. (D) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, upon compliance by the insurer with all requirements of this section, such an insurance policy expires on the expiration date stated in the policy and notice of nonrenewal. Section 2. That existing section 3937.26 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect six months after the effective date of this section.